utilities/dictionaries/cs_CS-Czech.aff
SFX Z Y 133
SFX Z   a           i          [aeiouyžščřj]a
SFX Z   a           i          [^srn]ca
SFX Z   ca          ky         [srn]ca
SFX Z   ďa          di         ďa
SFX Z   ňa          ni         ňa
SFX Z   ťa          ti         ťa
SFX Z   a           y          [^aeiouyžščřcjďťň]a
SFX Z   a           ě          [bdfmnptvw]a
SFX Z   ďa          dě         ďa
SFX Z   ňa          ně         ňa
SFX Z   ťa          tě         ťa
SFX Z   ga          ze         ga
SFX Z   cha         še         cha
SFX Z   ha          ze         [^c]ha
SFX Z   ka          ce         ka
SFX Z   ra          ře         [^r]ra
SFX Z   rra         ře         rra
SFX Z   a           e          [^bdfmnptvwďťňghkr]a
SFX Z   a           u          a
SFX Z   a           o          a
SFX Z   a           ou         a
SFX Z   a           y          ea
SFX Z   a           í          [aeiouy]a
SFX Z   a           ám         a
SFX Z   a           ách        a
SFX Z   0           mi         a
SFX Z   y           ám         [^a]y
SFX Z   y           ách        [^a]y
SFX Z   y           ami        [^a]y
SFX Z   0           e          ay
SFX Z   0           i          ay
SFX Z   0           í          ay
SFX Z   0           ím         ay
SFX Z   0           ích        ay
SFX Z   0           emi        ay
SFX Z   s           da         s
SFX Z   s           dy         s
SFX Z   s           dě         s
SFX Z   s           du         s
SFX Z   s           do         s
SFX Z   s           dou        s
SFX Z   s           dám        s
SFX Z   s           dách       s
SFX Z   s           dami       s
SFX Z   e           i          [^g]e
SFX Z   e           í          [^g]e
SFX Z   e           ím         [^g]e
SFX Z   e           ích        [^g]e
SFX Z   0           mi         [^g]e
SFX Z   ě           i          ě
SFX Z   ě           í          ě
SFX Z   ě           ím         ě
SFX Z   ě           ích        ě
SFX Z   0           mi         ě
SFX Z   ge          ži         dge
SFX Z   ge          ží         dge
SFX Z   ge          žím        dge
SFX Z   ge          žích       dge
SFX Z   ge          žemi       dge
SFX Z   eň          ně         [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   eň          ni         [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   eň          ní         [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   eň          ním        [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   eň          ních       [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   eň          němi       [^aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   ň           ně         [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   ň           ni         [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   ň           ní         [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   ň           ním        [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   ň           ních       [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   ň           němi       [aeioyě]seň
SFX Z   eň          ně         [^lřs]eň
SFX Z   eň          ni         [^lřs]eň
SFX Z   eň          ní         [^lřs]eň
SFX Z   eň          ním        [^lřs]eň
SFX Z   eň          ních       [^lřs]eň
SFX Z   eň          němi       [^lřs]eň
SFX Z   ň           ně         [lř]eň
SFX Z   ň           ni         [lř]eň
SFX Z   ň           ní         [lř]eň
SFX Z   ň           ním        [lř]eň
SFX Z   ň           ních       [lř]eň
SFX Z   ň           němi       [lř]eň
SFX Z   ev          ve         ev
SFX Z   ev          vi         ev
SFX Z   ev          ví         ev
SFX Z   ev          vím        ev
SFX Z   ev          vích       ev
SFX Z   ev          vemi       ev
SFX Z   ec          ce         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          ci         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cí         [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cím        [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cích       [^lp]ec
SFX Z   ec          cemi       [^lp]ec
SFX Z   0           e          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           i          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           í          [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           ím         [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           ích        [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           emi        [lp]ec
SFX Z   0           e          [jlptxzčšřž]
SFX Z   0           i          [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z   0           í          [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z   0           ím         [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z   0           ích        [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z   0           emi        [jlmptxzčšřž]
SFX Z   0           ě          em
SFX Z   0           ěmi        em
SFX Z   0           e          [^e][cmv]
SFX Z   0           i          [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           í          [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           ím         [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           ích        [^e][cv]
SFX Z   0           emi        [^e][cv]
SFX Z   ň           ně         [^e]ň
SFX Z   ň           ni         [^e]ň
SFX Z   ň           ní         [^e]ň
SFX Z   ň           ním        [^e]ň
SFX Z   ň           ních       [^e]ň
SFX Z   ň           němi       [^e]ň
SFX Z   ť           tě         ť
SFX Z   ť           ti         ť
SFX Z   ť           tí         ť
SFX Z   ť           tím        ť
SFX Z   ť           tích       ť
SFX Z   ť           těmi       ť
SFX Z   ď           dě         ď
SFX Z   ď           di         ď
SFX Z   ď           dí         ď
SFX Z   ď           dím        ď
SFX Z   ď           dích       ď
SFX Z   ď           děmi       ď
