utilities/dictionaries/cs_CS-Czech.dic
Alamánie/Z
Amiranty/ZQ
Angolanka/ZQ
Arimatie/Z
Azory/ZQ
Beata/ZQ
Biafra/ZQ
Bombaj/Z
Brtnička/ZQ
Bódhgaja/ZQ
Cetviny/ZQ
Chrudimka/ZQ
Danuše/Z
Dominika/ZQ
Dášenka/ZQ
Esmeralda/ZQ
Filadelfie/Z
Galie/Z
Gréta/ZQ
Hanýžka/ZQ
Hortobágy/Z
Indonésanka/ZQ
Izraelka/ZQ
Jena/ZQ
Josefína/ZQ
Kampa/ZQ
Katalánka/ZQ
Klokočka/PVZQ
Kordillery/ZQ
Kubáň/UVZ
Křtiny/ZQ
Leontýnka/ZQ
Libverda/ZQ
Livie/Z
Lucinda/ZQ
Madlenka/ZQ
Mandava/ZQ
Marýnka/ZQ
Mikronésie/Z
Mongolka/ZQ
Málinka/ZQ
Ndžamena/ZQ
Nikósie/Z
Oklahoma/ZQ
Osaka/ZQ
Pasohlávky/ZQ
Piava/ZQ
Postřižiny/ZQ
Pálava/ZQ
Regína/ZQ
Rozsíčka/ZQ
Samoa/ZQ
Sierraleoňanka/ZQ
Sněhulka/ZQ
Stephanie/Z
Svitava/ZQ
Tatiana/ZQ
Tlestky/ZQ
Tuklaty/ZQ
Uhliště/ZQ
Velichovky/ZQ
Violka/ZQ
Vorkuta/ZQ
Yvona/ZQ
Zlámanka/ZQ
ablaktace/Z
acetaldehydoxidáza/ZQ
adidasky/ZQ
aerolinie/Z
afrikanizace/Z
agogika/ZQ
agrotechnika/ZQ
akrece/Z
akupresura/ZQ
alela/ZQ
alkylsloučenina/ZQ
alumatka/ZQ
amfibolie/Z
anabaptistka/ZQ
andrologie/Z
anglofobie/Z
anorgasmie/Z
antikomunistka/ZQ
antropogeneze/Z
apelace/Z
aprobace/Z
archivace/Z
arterie/Z
asexualita/ZQ
astrochemie/Z
ataka/ZQ
atrézie/Z
autentizace/Z
autoimunita/ZQ
autoreference/Z
auxologie/Z
ažura/ZQ
bakterioložka/ZQ
bambule/Z
bariéra/ZQ
batrachologie/Z
begonie/Z
beruška/ZQ
bible/Z
binarita/ZQ
bioklimatoložka/ZQ
biopsychologie/Z
blanka/ZQ
blůzička/ZQ
bomba/ZQ
botinka/ZQ
branže/Z
bronchitida/ZQ
bryologie/Z
bulharka/ZQ
bysta/ZQ
bóje/Z
břidlice/ZQ
cementárna/ZQ
cetie/Z
chemiluminiscence/Z
chmelnice/ZQ
chrestomatie/Z
chuděrka/ZQ
cibulačka/ZQ
cirkulace/Z
coververze/Z
cyklotrasa/ZQ
císařovna/ZQ
dealkylace/Z
defeminizace/Z
dehydrace/Z
dekomposice/ZQ
dematerializace/Z
dendrobiologie/Z
depeše/Z
dermatoložka/ZQ
desorganizace/Z
detesaurace/Z
devíza/ZQ
diachronie/Z
didaktička/ZQ
dilogie/Z
disimulace/Z
disponibilita/ZQ
divizna/ZQ
dobývka/ZQ
doktrína/ZQ
doporučenka/ZQ
dozdívka/ZQ
drezura/ZQ
druhohory/ZQ
drůbežárna/ZQ
dutinka/ZQ
dvojkombinace/Z
dvoustrana/ZQ
dysmuzie/Z
démonoložka/ZQ
dělička/ZQ
dříčka/ZQ
efebolie/Z
ekonomie/Z
elektrika/ZQ
elektromyografie/Z
emanace/Z
encefaloragie/Z
entalechie/Z
epigramatička/ZQ
ergonomie/Z
esterifikace/Z
etnomuzikoložka/ZQ
euthymie/Z
exegeze/Z
exorcistka/ZQ
exsocialistka/ZQ
facilita/ZQ
fanynka/ZQ
favoritka/ZQ
fenomenoložka/ZQ
figurace/Z
finišmanka/ZQ
flobertka/ZQ
fonace/Z
fosfatáza/ZQ
fotolaboratoř/Z
frajerka/ZQ
friulština/ZQ
fumigace/Z
fytotoxicita/ZQ
galaktóza/ZQ
gambusie/Z
gastroskopie/Z
geochemie/Z
gerentoložka/ZQ
globalizace/Z
gnotobiologie/Z
gramodeska/ZQ
gudžrátština/ZQ
habije/Z
hambálka/ZQ
hauština/ZQ
helmovka/ZQ
herda/ZQ
heterotopie/Z
histomoniáza/ZQ
hlenka/ZQ
hnojnice/ZQ
holička/ZQ
homole/Z
hortenzie/Z
houžvička/ZQ
hrdlička/ZQ
hrázička/ZQ
huspenina/ZQ
hydrofobie/Z
hydroxysloučenina/ZQ
hyperprolaktinemie/Z
hypocykloida/ZQ
hysterička/ZQ
iberština/ZQ
idoletrie/Z
imatrikulace/Z
imunodeficience/Z
indoevropeistka/ZQ
influenza/ZQ
inkarcerace/Z
inspektorie/Z
intenzita/ZQ
intertextualita/ZQ
invence/Z
ischurie/Z
izotopie/Z
jarovizace/Z
jednozrnka/ZQ
ještěrka/ZQ
jmenovkyně/ZQ
juvenilie/Z
kabinka/ZQ
kakotechnofobie/Z
kalotypie/Z
kanalizace/Z
kapacita/ZQ
kapsle/Z
karcinogenita/ZQ
karotka/ZQ
kastilština/ZQ
katolička/ZQ
kašubština/ZQ
kilovka/ZQ
klasifikace/Z
klevetnice/ZQ
klobáska/ZQ
knihovna/ZQ
koedice/Z
koktejlky/ZQ
kolineace/Z
kolotočářka/ZQ
kominterna/ZQ
komponenta/ZQ
koncipientka/ZQ
kongesce/Z
konstance/Z
kontraoktáva/ZQ
konzervace/Z
kopistka/ZQ
korelace/Z
kosička/ZQ
kotlina/ZQ
koxartróza/ZQ
košťálovina/ZQ
kraniologie/Z
krempa/ZQ
krkovička/ZQ
krušinka/ZQ
krysa/ZQ
kuběnka/ZQ
kulminace/Z
kurtoezie/Z
kuželosečka/ZQ
kvinta/ZQ
kyniatrie/Z
káznice/ZQ
křtitelnička/ZQ
lacerace/Z
lalace/Z
laryngektomie/Z
lazura/ZQ
legislativa/ZQ
leptospira/ZQ
lexikologie/Z
lidičky/ZQ
linearizace/Z
litina/ZQ
lodyha/ZQ
lordoskolióza/ZQ
lucemburština/ZQ
luxsekunda/ZQ
láhev/Z
lípa/Z
magie/Z
makačka/ZQ
maladaptace/Z
malvice/Z
mandolína/ZQ
maorština/ZQ
marína/ZQ
mateřinka/ZQ
mayovka/ZQ
mechanizátorka/ZQ
megera/ZQ
mercerace/Z
metastruktura/ZQ
metrizace/Z
mezzosopranistka/ZQ
mikrofotografie/Z
mikroštěrbina/ZQ
mineta/ZQ
minuskule/Z
mizérie/Z
mnohonožka/ZQ
modř/ZI
monoftongizace/Z
monódie/Z
mostnice/ZQ
močůvka/ZQ
mudrdlantka/ZQ
muzeologie/Z
mykoparasitologie/Z
myšice/ZQ
mínuska/ZQ
měnírna/ZQ
nadezdívka/ZQ
naftylthiomočovina/ZQ
napodobitelka/ZQ
nausea/ZQ
nefropatie/Z
nelékařka/ZQ
nerealizace/Z
neurolingvistika/ZQ
neziskovka/ZQ
nitrolátka/ZQ
nomokracie/Z
nosálka/ZQ
novostavba/ZQ
nutace/Z
nálepka/ZQ
násobilka/ZQ
nénie/Z
obilka/ZQ
obnova/ZQ
obsluhovatelka/ZQ
ocel/ZI
odchovna/ZQ
odorologie/Z
odvěsna/ZQ
ohrádka/ZQ
okuje/Z
olšina/ZQ
oneiromantie/Z
opečka/ZQ
optimalizace/Z
ordonance/Z
ortodentie/Z
oslava/ZQ
osteoartitida/ZQ
osvoboditelka/ZQ
ouklejice/Z
oznamovatelka/ZQ
pacinka/ZQ
paleobotanika/ZQ
pampa/ZQ
panuška/ZQ
paragrafie/Z
pareunie/Z
parozábrana/ZQ
pasovka/ZQ
patience/Z
paušalizace/Z
peckovička/ZQ
peleta/ZQ
performance/Z
perlička/ZQ
personalistika/ZQ
petrografie/Z
pika/ZQ
pionýrka/ZQ
pižmovka/ZQ
plastifikace/Z
plenta/ZQ
plomba/ZQ
plácačka/ZQ
pneumotomie/Z
podezdívka/ZQ
podnožka/ZQ
podskupina/ZQ
poděbradka/ZQ
pojistka/ZQ
polarita/ZQ
polodálnice/ZQ
polovice/ZQ
polyneuritida/ZQ
pontifikálie/Z
pornokazeta/ZQ
poslankyně/ZQ
potamologie/Z
použivatelka/ZQ
poéma/ZQ
pragmatistka/ZQ
pratetička/ZQ
predisposice/ZQ
prepozice/Z
privace/Z
proformafaktura/ZQ
prokuristka/ZQ
propedeutika/ZQ
prostitutka/ZQ
protihráčka/ZQ
protýkačka/ZQ
prudérie/Z
prášilovština/ZQ
pseudohumanistka/ZQ
psychofyzika/ZQ
ptóza/ZQ
puntičkářka/ZQ
pyrogenita/ZQ
pávice/ZQ
pístnice/ZQ
pětačtyřicetiminutovka/ZQ
předchůdkyně/ZQ
předpremiéra/ZQ
přehláska/ZQ
přepážka/ZQ
převýchova/ZQ
příhoda/ZQ
příruba/ZQ
půjčovna/ZQ
radioaktivita/ZQ
radistka/ZQ
ranvej/Z
reaktiavace/Z
recitátorka/ZQ
reformátorka/ZQ
reivindikace/Z
rekreologie/Z
reluktance/Z
renumerace/Z
reptilie/Z
resuscitace/Z
revitalizace/Z
rigidita/ZQ
rohož/Z
rosa/ZQ
rozbrušovačka/ZQ
rozmývačka/ZQ
rozvodna/ZQ
rulička/ZQ
ryba/ZQ
rytinka/ZQ
růž/Z
salpingitida/ZQ
samotářka/ZQ
satira/ZQ
sběř/Z
sebeanalýza/ZQ
sebevražda/ZQ
sedmisegmentovka/ZQ
sekundistka/ZQ
sensibilace/Z
serigrafie/Z
sezóna/ZQ
sika/ZQ
sinusovka/ZQ
skelnička/ZQ
sklárna/ZQ
skulina/ZQ
slavistika/ZQ
sloj/KZ
služebna/ZQ
smola/ZQ
snovačka/ZQ
sociopsychologie/Z
somatologie/Z
soulož/Z
spalovna/ZQ
spermotvorba/ZQ
spojivka/ZQ
spoluzaměstnankyně/ZQ
spára/ZQ
stabilita/ZQN
starůstka/ZQ
stenotypistka/ZQ
stojatka/ZQ
stočka/ZQ
strojovnička/ZQ
studnička/ZQ
stážistka/ZQ
střevlička/ZQ
subfosilie/Z
superdividenda/ZQ
svazarmovkyně/ZQ
syfilitička/ZQ
sádrovka/ZQ
taburetka/ZQ
tauromachie/Z
telestézie/Z
teritorialita/ZQ
textologie/Z
tlapička/ZQ
toxikodynamika/ZQ
transpersonalita/ZQ
trichinelóza/ZQ
trubička/ZQ
tvaroznalkyně/ZQ
těžnice/Z
ubytovatelka/ZQ
uniforma/ZQ
uzance/Z
vanička/ZQ
velkobanka/Z
verzifikace/Z
videoukázka/ZQ
viskozita/ZQ
vláha/ZQ
vorvaňovina/ZQ
vycezenina/ZQ
vystřihovánka/ZQ
válečka/ZQ
výloha/ZQ
výzkumnice/ZQ
xenie/Z
zastupitelka/ZQ
země/Z
zonace/Z
zubatka/ZQ
záloha/ZQ
závitka/ZQ
úhlopříčka/ZQ
Černava/PVZQ
červenice/Z
čtvrtminuta/ZQ
číslovka/ZQ
římsa/ZQ
šatna/ZQ
šipka/ZQ
šmelina/ZQ
štafeta/ZQ
švestička/ZQ
žahalka/ZQ
živorodka/ZQ
